test/src/morphology/verb-paras_gt-norm.yaml
  V_TÄHDÄTÄ: #
    tähdätä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: tähdätä # aim
  V_VONGATA: #
    vongata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: vongata # beg
  V_VÄNGÄTÄ: #
    vängätä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: vängätä # argue
  V_TEMMATA: #
    temmata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: temmata # pull
  V_MULLATA: #
    mullata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: mullata # dirt
  V_SUUNNATA: #
    suunnata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: suunnata # go
  V_RYNNÄTÄ: #
    rynnätä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: rynnätä # rush
  V_VIRRATA: #
    virrata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: virrata # stream
  V_HYLJÄTÄ: #
    hyljätä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: hyljätä # abandon
  V_DIGATA: #
    digata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: digata # dig
  V_LOBATA: #
    lobata+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: lobata # lobby
  V_KARHUTA: #
    karhuta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: karhuta # tax
  V_TÄHYTÄ: #
    tähytä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: tähytä # periscope
  V_KAIKOTA: #
    kaikota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kaikota # disappear
  V_POIKETA: #
    poiketa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: poiketa # 
  V_KERETÄ: #
    keretä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: keretä # 
  V_KOUKUTA: #
    koukuta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: koukuta # hook
  V_PULPUTA: #
    pulputa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: pulputa # pulp
  V_UPOTA: #
    upota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: upota # sink
  V_LOTOTA: #
    lotota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: lotota # lotto
  V_LUUTUTA: #
    luututa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: luututa # mop
  V_KIVUTA: #
    kivuta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kivuta # climb
  V_KORVETA: #
    korveta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: korveta # 
  V_REVETÄ: #
    kiivetä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kiivetä # climb
  V_KIRVOTA: #
    kirvota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kirvota # loose
  V_KADOTA: #
    kadota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kadota # disappear
  V_TODETA: #
    todeta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: todeta # note
  V_VYYHDETÄ: #
    vyyhdetä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: vyyhdetä # entangle
  V_LIIDUTA: #
    liiduta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: liiduta # chalk
  V_TUNGETA: #
    tungeta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: tungeta # push
  V_PINGOTA: #
    pingota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: pingota # ping
  V_ÄNGETÄ: #
    ängetä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: ängetä # push
  V_KUMMUTA: #
    kummuta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kummuta # 
  V_KAMMETA: #
    kammeta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: kammeta # lever
  V_SAMMOTA: #
    sammota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: sammota # 
  V_INNOTA: #
    innota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: innota # eager
  V_IRROTA: #
    irrota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: irrota # tear
  V_HALJETA: #
    haljeta+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: haljeta # split
  V_ILJETÄ: #
    iljetä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: iljetä # dare
  V_MYRSKYTÄ: #
    myrskytä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: myrskytä # storm
  V_LASSOTA: #
    lassota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: lassota # lasso
  V_SELVITÄ: #
    selvitä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: selvitä # manage
  V_RYÖPYTÄ: #
    ryöpytä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: ryöpytä # flood
  V_PEITOTA: #
    peitota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: peitota # beat
  V_KERITÄ: #
    keritä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: keritä # 
  V_MUODOTA: #
    muodota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: muodota # form
  V_LÄMMITÄ: #
    lämmitä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: lämmitä # heat
  V_AALLOTA: #
    aallota+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: aallota # wave
  V_HELLITÄ: #
    hellitä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: hellitä # loose
  V_TAITAA: #
    taitaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: taitaa # can
  V_TIETÄÄ: #
    tietää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: tietää # know
  V_VIPAJAA: #
    vipajaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: vipajaa # thump
  V_HELÄJÄÄ: #
    heläjää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: heläjää # chime
  V_RAIKAA: #
    raikaa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: raikaa # baum
  V_ÄHKÄÄ: #
    ähkää+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: ähkää # meh
  V_OLLA: #
    olla+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat: olla # be
    olla+V+Act+Pot+Sg1: lienen # 
    olla+V+Act+Pot+ConNeg: lie # 
    olla+V+Der/ja+Sg+Nom: olija # 
